District of Columbia statutes.
6-1406.01

Repealed

Construction and Zoning Compliance Management Fund.

Repealed.

Mar. 21, 1987, D.C. Law 6-216, § 7a
as added Dec. 7, 2004, D.C. Law 15-205, § 2042, 51 DCR 8441
Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-191, § 128, 53 DCR 6794
Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 2021(a), 57 DCR 181
Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 9037, 58 DCR 6226
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2042 of Fiscal Year 2005 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-486, August 2, 2004, 51 DCR 8236).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2042 of Fiscal Year 2005 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-594, October 26, 2004, 51 DCR 11725).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2021(a) of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2021(a) of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).

Short title of subtitle D of title II of Law 15-205: Section 2041 of D.C. Law 15-205 provided that subtitle D of title II of the act may be cited as the Construction and Zoning Compliance Management Fund Amendment Act of 2004.

Short title: Section 2020 of D.C. Law 18-111 provided that subtitle C of title II of the act may be cited as the “Zoning Enhanced Customer Services Amendment Act of 2009”.

Section 44 of D.C. Law 19-171 made a technical correction to this section after its repeal by D.C. Law 19-21.